Vermont, session 2025-2026, H747.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as the “No Secret Police Act.”
Sec. 2. 20 V.S.A. § 2373 is added to read:
§ 2373. STANDARDS FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT IDENTIFICATION
(a) Legislative intent.
(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly to exercise the power
granted to Vermont by the 10th Amendment to the U.S. Constitution to protect
the health, safety, and welfare of its residents and law enforcement officers
present in the State by codifying standards for law enforcement identification.
VT LEG #385975 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.747
2026 Page 3 of 6
(2) Community safety requires trust in law enforcement, which is
undermined when armed masked agents disrupt and kidnap members of the
community without warning, warrant, or identification. By codifying
standards for law enforcement identification, it is the intent of the General
Assembly to promote transparency and accountability and to reduce the risk of
conflict escalation, thereby enhancing the safety of both officers and members
of the public.
(b) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Law enforcement agency” has the same meaning as in section
2351a of this title.
(2) “Law enforcement officer” has the same meaning as in section
2351a of this title and includes any officer of a federal law enforcement agency
or any person acting on behalf of a local, state, or federal law enforcement
agency.
(3) “Mask” means a facial covering that conceals or obscures the facial
identity of an individual, including garments, helmets, and headgear, such as
balaclavas, tactical masks, gators, and ski masks.
(c) Identification requirements.
(1) A law enforcement officer shall be clearly identified by the officer’s
agency and by the officer’s name or badge number, or both, on the officer’s
uniform.
VT LEG #385975 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.747
2026 Page 4 of 6
(2) A law enforcement officer shall not wear any mask or personal
disguise while interacting with the public in the performance of the officer’s
duties.
(3) Notwithstanding subdivision (2) of this subsection, a law
enforcement officer in the performance of the officer’s duties may wear the
following:
(A) a medical-grade mask that is surgical;
(B) an N95 respirator designed to prevent the transmission of
airborne diseases;
(C) a mask designed to protect against exposure to smoke during a
fire-involved situation;
(D) a mask, helmet, or device, such as a self-contained breathing
apparatus, necessary to perform duties during a water rescue operation;
(E) a mask related to protection against exposure to biological or
chemical agents during an incident where these agents may be present;
(F) a mask designed to protect against exposure to cold during a
declared weather emergency;
(G) a motorcycle helmet when utilizing a motorcycle or other vehicle
that requires a helmet for safe operation; or
(H) eyewear necessary to protect against the use of retinal weapons,
such as lasers.
VT LEG #385975 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.747
2026 Page 5 of 6
(4) Notwithstanding subdivision (2) of this subsection, the following is
permitted:
(A) Tactical Services Unit (TSU) team officers may use gear
necessary to protect their faces from physical harm while performing TSU
responsibilities.
(B) Law enforcement officers who participate in lawful active
undercover drug-related operations or assignments may use a mask or a
personal disguise when necessary to perform such operations or assignments.
(d) Policy. Any law enforcement agency operating in the State shall
develop, distribute to all personnel, and publicly post a written policy on the
identification requirements of this section. The policy shall include, at a
minimum, the following:
(1) a requirement that all law enforcement officers shall visibly display
identification that includes their agency and their name or badge number while
interacting with the public in the performance of the officer’s duties; and
(2) a narrowly tailored exception for undercover assignments pursuant
to subdivision (c)(4)(B) of this section.
(e) Penalty. A law enforcement officer who violates subsection (c) of this
section shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than
$1,000.00, or both.
VT LEG #385975 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.747
2026 Page 6 of 6
(f) Remedies.
(1) A law enforcement officer who violates this section and knowingly
and willfully arrests or assists with an arrest may be liable in a civil action for
false imprisonment.
(2) An individual who is arrested by a law enforcement officer in
violation of this section may bring a civil action against the violator for:
(A) monetary damages;
(B) injunctive, equitable, or declaratory relief;
(C) punitive damages; and
(D) reasonable costs and attorney’s fees.
(3) The Attorney General may bring a civil action on behalf of the State
for appropriate injunctive, equitable, or declaratory relief if there is reasonable
cause to believe that a violation of this section has occurred or will occur.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385975 v.2